Utah statutes.
49-15-501.   Death of active member in Division A -- Payment of benefits.
(1)  If an active member of this system enrolled in Division A under Section
49-15-301 dies, benefits are payable as follows:
(a) If the death is classified by the office as a line-of-duty death, benefits
are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued less than 20 years of public safety service
credit, the spouse at the time of death shall receive a lump sum of $1,000 and
an allowance equal to 30% of the member's final average monthly salary.
(ii)  If the member has accrued 20 or more years of public safety service
credit, the member shall be considered to have retired with an allowance
calculated under Section 49-15-402 and the spouse at the time of death shall
receive the death benefit payable to a spouse at the time of death under
Section 49-15-504.
(b)  If the death is not classified as a line-of-duty death by the office,
benefits are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued less than ten years of public safety service
credit, the beneficiary shall receive the sum of $1,000 or a refund of the
member's member contributions, whichever is greater.
(ii)  If the member has accrued ten or more years, but less than 20 years of
public safety service credit at the time of death, the spouse at the time of
death shall receive the sum of $500, plus an allowance equal to 2% of the
member's final average monthly salary for each year of service credit accrued
by the member up to a maximum of 30% of the member's final average monthly
salary.
(iii)  If the member has accrued 20 or more years of public safety service
credit, the benefit shall be calculated as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii).
(2)  Benefits are not payable to minor children under Division A.
(3)  If a benefit is not distributed under this section, and the member has
designated a beneficiary, the member's member contribution shall be paid to
the beneficiary.
